closure.aff
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrà             avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avremo           avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrete           avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avranno          avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrei            avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avresti          avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrebbe          avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avremmo          avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avreste          avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  avrebbero        avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  abbia            avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  abbiate/e        avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  abbiano          avere
SFX V_c2_  avere  abbi/e           avere
SFX V_c2   acere  accio        [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acciamo/e    [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acciono      [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acqui        [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acque        [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acquero      [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  accia        [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acciate      [it]acere
SFX V_c2   acere  acciano      [it]acere
SFX V_c2  uocere  ocere/V        nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  occio          nuocere
SFX V_c2   ocere  occio          nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  occiono        nuocere
SFX V_c2   ocere  occiono        nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  ocqui          nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  ocque          nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  ocquero        nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  occia          nuocere
SFX V_c2   ocere  occia          nuocere
SFX V_c2  uocere  occiano        nuocere
SFX V_c2   ocere  occiano        nuocere
SFX V_c2   adere  addi            cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adde            cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  addero          cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrò            cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrai           cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrà            cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adremo          cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrete          cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adranno         cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrei           cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adresti         cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrebbe         cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adremmo         cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adreste         cadere
SFX V_c2   adere  adrebbero       cadere
SFX V_c2   edere iedere/V         sedere
SFX V_c2   edere  eggo            sedere
SFX V_c2   edere  eggono          sedere
SFX V_c2   edere  egga            sedere
SFX V_c2   edere  eggano          sedere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrò            godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrai           godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrà            godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odremo          godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrete          godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odranno         godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrei           godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odresti         godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrebbe         godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odremmo         godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odreste         godere
SFX V_c2   odere  odrebbero       godere
SFX V_c2   alere  aglia           calere
SFX V_c2   alere  alse            calere
SFX V_c2   alere  algo            valere
SFX V_c2   alere  algono          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  alsero          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrò            valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrai           valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrà            valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arremo          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrete          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arranno         valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrei           valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arresti         valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrebbe         valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arremmo         valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arreste         valere
SFX V_c2   alere  arrebbero       valere
SFX V_c2   alere  alga            valere
SFX V_c2   alere  algano          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  also/e          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  alsa/e          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  alsi/e          valere
SFX V_c2   alere  alse/e          valere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elsero      [cv]ellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elso/e         cellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elsa/e         cellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elsi/e         cellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  else/e         cellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elgo           vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elgono         vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elsi           vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  else           vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elga           vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elgano         vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  ulsero      [pv]ellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  ulso/e      [pv]ellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  ulsa/e      [pv]ellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  ulsi/e      [pv]ellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  ulse/e      [pv]ellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elto/e         vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elta/e         vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elti/e         vellere
SFX V_c2  ellere  elte/e         vellere
SFX V_c2   olere  oglio           solere
SFX V_c2   olere  uoli            solere
SFX V_c2   olere  uole            solere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliamo         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliono         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  oglia           solere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliate         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliano         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  olito/e         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  olita/e         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  oliti/e         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  olite/e         solere
SFX V_c2   olere  olgo            dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  uoli/e          dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  uole            dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliamo/e       dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  olgono          dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  olsi            dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  olse            dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  olsero          dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrò         [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrai        [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrà         [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orremo       [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrete       [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orranno      [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrei        [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orresti      [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrebbe      [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orremmo      [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orreste      [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  orrebbero    [dv]olere
SFX V_c2   olere  olga            dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  oglia           dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliate         dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  olgano          dolere
SFX V_c2   olere  oglio           volere
SFX V_c2   olere  uoi             volere
SFX V_c2   olere  uole            volere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliamo/e       volere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliono         volere
SFX V_c2   olere  olli            volere
SFX V_c2   olere  olle            volere
SFX V_c2   olere  ollero          volere
SFX V_c2   olere  oglia           volere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliate/e       volere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogliano         volere
SFX V_c2   olere  ogli/e          volere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olsi        [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olse        [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olsero      [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olto/e         solvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olta/e         solvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olti/e         solvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olte/e         solvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  oluto/e     [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  oluta/e     [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  oluti/e     [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2  olvere  olute/e     [sv]olvere
SFX V_c2 inquere  inquito/e     linquere
SFX V_c2 inquere  inquita/e     linquere
SFX V_c2 inquere  inquiti/e     linquere
SFX V_c2 inquere  inquite/e     linquere
SFX V_c2  andere  ansero         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  anso/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  ansa/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  ansi/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  anse/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  anto/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  anta/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  anti/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  andere  ante/e         pandere
SFX V_c2  endere  esero    [cfprt]endere
SFX V_c2  endere  eso/e    [cfprt]endere
SFX V_c2  endere  esa/e    [cfprt]endere
SFX V_c2  endere  esi/e    [cfprt]endere
SFX V_c2  endere  ese/e    [cfprt]endere
SFX V_c2   imere  ensi            dimere
SFX V_c2   imere  ense            dimere
SFX V_c2   imere  ensero          dimere
SFX V_c2   imere  ento/e          dimere
SFX V_c2   imere  enta/e          dimere
SFX V_c2   imere  enti/e          dimere
SFX V_c2   imere  ente/e          dimere
SFX V_c2   enere  engo            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  ieni/e          tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  iene            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  engono          tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  enni            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  enne            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  ennero          tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errò            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errai           tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errà            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  erremo          tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errete          tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  erranno         tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errei           tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  erresti         tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errebbe         tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  erremmo         tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  erreste         tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  errebbero       tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  enga            tenere
SFX V_c2   enere  engano          tenere
SFX V_c2  incere  insi           vincere
SFX V_c2  incere  inse           vincere
SFX V_c2  incere  insero         vincere
SFX V_c2  incere  into/e         vincere
SFX V_c2  incere  inta/e         vincere
SFX V_c2  incere  inti/e         vincere
SFX V_c2  incere  inte/e         vincere
SFX V_c2 inguere  insi          tinguere
SFX V_c2 inguere  inse          tinguere
SFX V_c2 inguere  insero        tinguere
SFX V_c2 inguere  into/e        tinguere
SFX V_c2 inguere  inta/e        tinguere
SFX V_c2 inguere  inti/e        tinguere
SFX V_c2 inguere  inte/e        tinguere
SFX V_c2   umere  unsi            sumere
SFX V_c2   umere  unse            sumere
SFX V_c2   umere  unsero          sumere
SFX V_c2   umere  unto/e          sumere
SFX V_c2   umere  unta/e          sumere
SFX V_c2   umere  unti/e          sumere
SFX V_c2   umere  unte/e          sumere
SFX V_c2   apere  o               sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  ai              sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  a               sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  appiamo/e       sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  anno            sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  eppi            sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  eppe            sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  eppero          sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprò            sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprai           sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprà            sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apremo          sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprete          sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apranno         sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprei           sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apresti         sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprebbe         sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apremmo         sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apreste         sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  aprebbero       sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  appia           sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  appiate/e       sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  appiano         sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  appi/e          sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apiente/e       sapere
SFX V_c2   apere  apienti/e       sapere
SFX V_c2   arere  aio             parere
SFX V_c2   arere  aiamo/e         parere
SFX V_c2   arere  aiono           parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arvi            parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arve            parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arvero          parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrò            parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrai           parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrà            parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arremo          parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrete          parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arranno         parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrei           parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arresti         parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrebbe         parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arremmo         parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arreste         parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arrebbero       parere
SFX V_c2   arere  aia             parere
SFX V_c2   arere  aiate           parere
SFX V_c2   arere  aiano           parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arvente/e       parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arventi/e       parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arso/e          parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arsa/e          parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arsi/e          parere
SFX V_c2   arere  arse/e          parere
SFX V_c2  argere  arso/e        spargere
SFX V_c2  argere  arsa/e        spargere
SFX V_c2  argere  arsi/e        spargere
